Washington statutes.
RCW 2.36.057

Expanded jury source list—Court rules.

The supreme court is requested to adopt court rules regarding methodology and standards for merging the list of registered voters in Washington state with the list of licensed drivers and identicard holders in Washington state for purposes of creating an expanded jury source list. The rules should specify the standard electronic format or formats in which the lists will be provided to requesting superior courts by Washington technology solutions. In the interim, and until such court rules become effective, the methodology and standards provided in RCW 2.36.054 shall apply. An expanded jury source list shall be available to the courts for use by September 1, 1994.

[ 2024 c 54 s 22; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 401; 2015 c 225 s 2; 1993 c 408 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 401-405, 409, 411, and 412: "Sections 401 through 405, 409, 411, and 412 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 24, 2015." [ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 603.]

Severability—Effective dates—1993 c 408: See notes following RCW 2.36.054.